Montana, session 2025, HB462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. High-quality instructional materials. (1) When developing recommendations for new or
revised content and performance standards under 20-7-101, the superintendent of public instruction, utilizing
the applicable negotiated rulemaking committee, shall develop recommendations and cost estimates for high-
quality instructional materials aligned with the content and performance standards as described in this section.
(2) The intent of this section is to:
(a) ensure the availability of high-quality instructional materials to school districts in the most cost-
efficient manner, while respecting the supervision and control of schools in each district by elected boards of
trustees;
(b) support the implementation of high-quality instructional materials, including professional
development for teachers and instructional leaders in a district;
(c) enhance opportunities for teacher collaboration within and between schools and districts
across the state;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 462
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 462
(d) reduce the amount of time teachers spend on developing instructional materials;
(e) enable partnerships with parents in supporting effective learning for their children with
transparent curricula; and
(f) put Montana on par with high-performing education systems around the world.
(3) The recommendations and cost estimates under subsection (1) must:
(a) identify no more than five and no fewer than three sets of HQIM for a set of content and
performance standards;
(b) be developed during the negotiated rulemaking process with the support of the external
nonprofit partner consultant; and
(c) include cost estimates for providing access to each set of HQIM based on various percentages
of adoption by school districts for the appropriate grade levels. The percentages must be in 10% increments
and based on the number of students, ranging from 10% of the total statewide enrollment for the appropriate
grade levels to 100% of the total statewide adoption. The cost estimates must also include the provision of
curriculum-aligned professional development for teachers and instructional leaders in implementing the HQIM.
(4) For the purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:
(a) "External nonprofit partner consultant" means a qualified nonprofit an individual or organization
that:
(i) possesses deep expertise with HQIM and experience in supporting broad and effective
implementation of HQIM as part of multidistrict initiatives;
(ii) does not receive financial support from publishers of HQIM; and
(iii) is approved by the board of public education on recommendation of the superintendent of
public instruction to support the selection and implementation of HQIM. The superintendent shall provide this
recommendation to the board at the time the superintendent requests board approval to begin the content
standard revision process.
(b) "High-quality instructional materials" or "HQIM" means systematic, knowledge-building
materials used for pupil instruction by a teacher that:
(i) align with, or can be readily adapted to align with, the content and performance standards
adopted by the board of public education in exercising its general supervision over the public school system;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 462
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 462
(ii) are designed for, or easily adaptable to, proficiency-based learning as defined in 20-7-1601;
(iii) include:
(A) support for implementation at the district, school, and classroom level; and
(B) initial and ongoing professional development for teachers and instructional leaders; and
(iv) are recommended by the superintendent of public instruction as described in this section.
(c) "Instructional leaders" means instructional coaches, school principals, and district
administrators with a role in supporting instruction and curriculum implementation.
Section 2. Section 20-7-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-101. Accreditation standards -- process for adoption. (1) (a) Accreditation standards, as
defined in 20-1-101, for all schools must be adopted by the board of public education upon the
recommendations of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent shall develop
recommendations in accordance with subsection (2). For an accreditation standard that requires
implementation by school districts, the recommendations presented to the board must include an economic
impact statement, as described in 2-4-405, prepared in consultation with the negotiated rulemaking committee
under subsection (2).
(b) (i) For accreditation standards addressing academic requirements, program area standards, or
content and performance standards, the economic impact statement under subsection (1)(a) must include an
analysis of the ability of school districts to implement the standard within existing resources, including time. The
intent of this subsection (1)(b) is to ensure that school districts have the capacity to adhere to required
accreditation standards within a basic system of free quality public elementary and secondary schools.
(ii) For accreditation standards addressing content and performance standards, the economic
impact statement must include recommendations and cost estimates for high-quality instructional materials
pursuant to [section 1].
(2) The accreditation standards recommended by the superintendent of public instruction must be
developed through the negotiated rulemaking process under Title 2, chapter 5, part 1. The superintendent may
form a negotiated rulemaking committee for accreditation standards to consider multiple proposals. The
negotiated rulemaking committee may not exist for longer than 2 years. The committee must represent the
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 462
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 462
diverse circumstances of schools of all sizes across the state and must include representatives from the
following groups:
(a) school district trustees;
(b) school administrators;
(c) teachers;
(d) school business officials;
(e) parents; and
(f) taxpayers.
(3) Prior to adoption or amendment of any accreditation standard, the board shall submit each
proposal, including the economic impact statement required under subsection (1), to:
(a) during a regular legislative session, the joint appropriations subcommittee on education; or
(b) during the legislative interim, the education interim budget committee established in 5-12-501,
for review at least 1 month in advance of a scheduled committee meeting.
(4) Unless the expenditures by school districts required under the proposal are determined by the
appropriate committee under subsection (3) to be insubstantial expenditures that can be readily absorbed into
the budgets of existing district programs, the board may not implement the standard until July 1 following:
(a) under subsection (3)(a), the current legislative session; or
(b) under subsection (3)(b), the next regular legislative session and shall request the
superintendent of public instruction include a request in the superintendent's budget that the same legislature
fund implementation of the proposed standard.
(5) The provisions of this section may not be construed to reduce or limit the authority of the
education interim committee to review administrative rules, including accreditation standards, within its
jurisdiction pursuant to 5-5-215.
(6) Standards for the retention of school records must be as provided in 20-1-212."
Section 3. Section 20-7-113, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-113. Maintenance of curriculum guide file and publishing curriculum guides by
superintendent of public instruction -- access and support for adoption of high-quality instructional
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 462
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 462
materials. (1) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect and maintain a file of curriculum guides to
be made available to districts for the use of schools in planning courses of instruction. The superintendent may
prepare, publish, and distribute curriculum guides for the use of schools in planning courses of instruction. The
superintendent may solicit the assistance of educators and other qualified persons in the preparation of
curriculum guides.
(2) (a) Contingent on appropriation from the legislature, the superintendent of public instruction
shall, after surveying interest and preference from school districts, ensure reduced-cost access for school
districts to HQIM and associated professional development of up to three of the HQIM recommended under
[section 1] and in a manner that provides ongoing cost savings for participating school districts, if possible.
(b) A school district provided subsidized access to and adopting HQIM under subsection (2)(a)
shall commit to utilizing pupil instruction-related days as necessary to ensure curriculum-aligned professional
development for teachers and instructional leaders coordinated by the office of public instruction in
collaboration with the external consultant for the applicable grade levels and content areas utilizing the HQIM
for the first 2 years following adoption.
(c) School districts are encouraged to work with neighboring school districts, especially if students
frequently transfer between districts, in selecting the same HQIM to foster greater collaboration among teachers
and instructional consistency and continuity for students and families.
(3) In implementing this section, the superintendent may:
(a) collaborate with the Montana digital academy; and
(b) partner with entities that provide curriculum support and curriculum-aligned professional
development."
Section 4. Section 20-7-114, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-114. Instructional assistance by superintendent of public instruction -- support and
professional development following adoption of high-quality instructional materials. (1) The
superintendent of public instruction shall, at the request of the district or county superintendent, assist the
schools with the planning, implementation, operation, and evaluation of instruction through inservice training
and individual consultation.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 462
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 462
(2) Contingent on appropriation from the legislature and in coordination with the external
consultant under [section 1], the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) ensure reduced-cost, curriculum-based professional learning for teachers and instructional
leaders in districts adopting HQIM under 20-7-113(2); and
(b) monitor student achievement in districts adopting HQIM through the statewide K-12 data
system.
(3) In implementing this section, the superintendent may:
(a) collaborate with the Montana digital academy; and
(b) partner with entities that provide curriculum support and curriculum-aligned professional
development."
Section 5. Appropriation. There is appropriated $5 million from the general fund to the office of
public instruction for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025. The money must be spent in providing support to
school districts in implementing the revised math content standards adopted by the board of public education
that are effective July 1, 2026, in the following manner:
(1) $3 million to support elementary and K-12 school districts in the adoption of HQIM for
mathematics in grades K-8 in the manner described in [this act]. In identifying HQIM aligned with the revised
standards, the superintendent may reform the negotiated rulemaking committee that developed the
recommendations for the revised math content standards or identify HQIM in another collaborative manner with
the assistance of an external consultant.
(2) $2 million to support high school and K-12 school districts in developing curriculum and
purchasing instructional materials for expanded high school math offerings, including math courses within
industry and trades pathways and for curriculum-aligned professional development.
Section 6. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
20, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 7, part 1, apply to [section 1].
Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 462
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 462
- END -
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 462
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 462, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 462
INTRODUCED BY D. BEDEY
AN ACT REVISING EDUCATION LAWS RELATED TO STATE SUPPORT FOR CURRICULUM AND
INSTRUCTION; CREATING A PROCESS THROUGH WHICH HIGH-QUALITY INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS
ARE IDENTIFIED AS PART OF THE CONTENT STANDARD REVISION PROCESS; REQUIRING THE
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION, CONTINGENT ON APPROPRIATION FROM THE
LEGISLATURE, TO PROVIDE REDUCED-COST ACCESS TO INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS AND
CURRICULUM-ALIGNED PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FOR SCHOOL DISTRICTS THAT CHOOSE TO
ADOPT HIGH-QUALITY INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS; PROVIDING DEFINITIONS; PROVIDING AN
APPROPRIATION; AMENDING SECTIONS 20-7-101, 20-7-113, AND 20-7-114, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN
EFFECTIVE DATE.”